Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2436
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2436 to 71-2443 shall be known and may be cited as the Immunosuppressant Drug Repository Program Act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 42.